Louisiana, session 2026, SB143.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2405.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2405.2. Commission on Law Enforcement Bulletproof Vest Fund; creation of
fund; eligibility
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:
(1) Smaller local law enforcement agencies within this state often lack
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 143 ENROLLED
sufficient financial resources to provide adequate protective equipment,
including bulletproof vests, for their commissioned peace officers.
(2) The provision of bulletproof vests is essential to protect the lives and
safety of those officers who serve and protect the public.
(3) The establishment of a dedicated fund is necessary to assist local law
enforcement agencies with limited financial capacity in acquiring bulletproof
vests, thereby saving lives and enhancing officer safety.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Commission" means the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice.
(2) "Eligible law enforcement agency" means any local, municipal, or
parish law enforcement agency within this state that employs fifteen or fewer
full-time commissioned peace officers.
(3) "Fund" means the Commission on Law Enforcement Bulletproof
Vest Fund established pursuant to this Section.
(4) "Peace officer" shall have the same definition as provided in R.S.
40:2402.
C.(1) There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund,
the "Commission on Law Enforcement Bulletproof Vest Fund" hereinafter
referred to in this Section as the "fund".
(2) After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund
as provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
treasurer shall deposit into the fund the following:
(a) Any monies transferred or appropriated to the fund by the
legislature.
(b) Donations, gifts, grants, or other revenue, including federal funds
received for the purchase of bulletproof vests, collected for the purposes of this
Section and received by the state treasurer.
(3) Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies
in the state general fund. Any interest earned on the investment of monies in the
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 143 ENROLLED
fund shall be credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in
the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
(4) The legislature shall appropriate monies from the fund to the
commission for any purpose authorized pursuant to this Section.
D.(1) Monies in the fund shall be used solely to provide financial
assistance to eligible law enforcement agencies for the purchase of bulletproof
vests for commissioned peace officers.
(2) In awarding funds pursuant to this Section, the commission shall give
priority to eligible law enforcement agencies that demonstrate a lack of
adequate bulletproof vests for their commissioned peace officers.
(3) The commission may consider the extent to which an agency lacks
bulletproof vests, the number of officers without vests, and the agency’s
financial needs when determining awards.
(4) The commission may establish matching fund requirements or
cost-sharing provisions as it deems appropriate.
E.(1) The Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice shall adopt rules and regulations in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act necessary for the
administration and enforcement of this Section.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules with respect to all of the following:
(a) Standards for the issuance of bulletproof vests; that the vests shall
meet United States Department of Justice, National Institute for Justice
standards; and that the vests shall be wholly manufactured within nations that
are a party to the United States-Mexico-Canada Agreement entered into force
on July 1, 2020.
(b) Application procedures and requirements.
(c) Criteria for awarding funds.
(d) Reporting and accountability requirements for recipient agencies.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 143 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.